Illinois, session 104th, SB3683.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 24-1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/24-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 24-1)7    Sec. 24-1. Unlawful possession of weapons. 8    (a) A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of 9weapons when he knowingly:10        (1) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 11    carries any bludgeon, black-jack, slung-shot, sand-club, 12    sand-bag, metal knuckles or other knuckle weapon 13    regardless of its composition, throwing star, or any 14    knife, commonly referred to as a switchblade knife, which 15    has a blade that opens automatically by hand pressure 16    applied to a button, spring or other device in the handle 17    of the knife, or a ballistic knife, which is a device that 18    propels a knifelike blade as a projectile by means of a 19    coil spring, elastic material or compressed gas; or20        (2) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 21    unlawfully against another, a dagger, dirk, billy, 22    dangerous knife, razor, stiletto, broken bottle or other 23    piece of glass, stun gun or taser or any other dangerous or   SB3683- 2 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1    deadly weapon or instrument of like character; or2        (2.5) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 3    unlawfully against another, any firearm in a church, 4    synagogue, mosque, or other building, structure, or place 5    used for religious worship; or 6        (3) Carries on or about his person or in any vehicle, a 7    tear gas gun projector or bomb or any object containing 8    noxious liquid gas or substance, other than an object 9    containing a non-lethal noxious liquid gas or substance 10    designed solely for personal defense carried by a person 11    18 years of age or older; or12        (4) Carries or possesses in any vehicle or concealed 13    on or about his person except when on his land or in his 14    own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place of business, or 15    on the land or in the legal dwelling of another person as 16    an invitee with that person's permission, any pistol, 17    revolver, stun gun or taser or other firearm, except that 18    this subsection (a)(4) does not apply to or affect 19    transportation of weapons that meet one of the following 20    conditions:21            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or22            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or23            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 24        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 25        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 26        Owner's Identification Card; or  SB3683- 3 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 2        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 3        been issued a currently valid license under the 4        Firearm Concealed Carry Act; or 5        (5) Sets a spring gun; or6        (6) Possesses any device or attachment of any kind 7    designed, used or intended for use in silencing the report 8    of any firearm; or9        (7) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 10    carries:11            (i) a machine gun, which shall be defined for the 12        purposes of this subsection as any weapon, which 13        shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily 14        restored to shoot, automatically more than one shot 15        without manually reloading by a single function of the 16        trigger, including the frame or receiver of any such 17        weapon, or sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses, 18        or carries any combination of parts designed or 19        intended for use in converting any weapon into a 20        machine gun, or any combination or parts from which a 21        machine gun can be assembled if such parts are in the 22        possession or under the control of a person;23            (ii) any rifle having one or more barrels less 24        than 16 inches in length or a shotgun having one or 25        more barrels less than 18 inches in length or any 26        weapon made from a rifle or shotgun, whether by   SB3683- 4 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1        alteration, modification, or otherwise, if such a 2        weapon as modified has an overall length of less than 3        26 inches; or4            (iii) any bomb, bomb-shell, grenade, bottle or 5        other container containing an explosive substance of 6        over one-quarter ounce for like purposes, such as, but 7        not limited to, black powder bombs and Molotov 8        cocktails or artillery projectiles; or9        (8) Carries or possesses any firearm, stun gun or 10    taser or other deadly weapon in any place which is 11    licensed to sell intoxicating beverages, or at any public 12    gathering held pursuant to a license issued by any 13    governmental body or any public gathering at which an 14    admission is charged, excluding a place where a showing, 15    demonstration or lecture involving the exhibition of 16    unloaded firearms is conducted.17        This subsection (a)(8) does not apply to any auction 18    or raffle of a firearm held pursuant to a license or permit 19    issued by a governmental body, nor does it apply to 20    persons engaged in firearm safety training courses; or21        (9) Carries or possesses in a vehicle or on or about 22    his or her person any pistol, revolver, stun gun or taser 23    or firearm or ballistic knife, when he or she is hooded, 24    robed or masked in such manner as to conceal his or her 25    identity; or26        (10) Carries or possesses on or about his or her   SB3683- 5 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1    person, upon any public street, alley, or other public 2    lands within the corporate limits of a city, village, or 3    incorporated town, except when an invitee thereon or 4    therein, for the purpose of the display of such weapon or 5    the lawful commerce in weapons, or except when on his land 6    or in his or her own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place 7    of business, or on the land or in the legal dwelling of 8    another person as an invitee with that person's 9    permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun, or taser or 10    other firearm, except that this subsection (a)(10) does 11    not apply to or affect transportation of weapons that meet 12    one of the following conditions:13            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or14            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or15            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 16        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 17        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 18        Owner's Identification Card; or19            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 20        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 21        been issued a currently valid license under the 22        Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 23        A "stun gun or taser", as used in this paragraph (a) 24    means (i) any device which is powered by electrical 25    charging units, such as, batteries, and which fires one or 26    several barbs attached to a length of wire and which, upon   SB3683- 6 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1    hitting a human, can send out a current capable of 2    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 3    to render him incapable of normal functioning or (ii) any 4    device which is powered by electrical charging units, such 5    as batteries, and which, upon contact with a human or 6    clothing worn by a human, can send out current capable of 7    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 8    to render him incapable of normal functioning; or9        (11) Sells, manufactures, delivers, imports, 10    possesses, or purchases any assault weapon attachment or 11    .50 caliber cartridge in violation of Section 24-1.9 or 12    any explosive bullet. For purposes of this paragraph (a) 13    "explosive bullet" means the projectile portion of an 14    ammunition cartridge which contains or carries an 15    explosive charge which will explode upon contact with the 16    flesh of a human or an animal. "Cartridge" means a tubular 17    metal case having a projectile affixed at the front 18    thereof and a cap or primer at the rear end thereof, with 19    the propellant contained in such tube between the 20    projectile and the cap; or21        (12) (Blank); or22        (13) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 23    person while in a building occupied by a unit of 24    government, a billy club, other weapon of like character, 25    or other instrument of like character intended for use as 26    a weapon. For the purposes of this Section, "billy club"   SB3683- 7 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1    means a short stick or club commonly carried by police 2    officers which is either telescopic or constructed of a 3    solid piece of wood or other man-made material; or4        (14) Manufactures, possesses, sells, or offers to 5    sell, purchase, manufacture, import, transfer, or use any 6    device, part, kit, tool, accessory, or combination of 7    parts that is designed to and functions to increase the 8    rate of fire of a semiautomatic firearm above the standard 9    rate of fire for semiautomatic firearms that is not 10    equipped with that device, part, or combination of parts; 11    or12        (15) Carries or possesses any assault weapon or .50 13    caliber rifle in violation of Section 24-1.9; or14        (16) Manufactures, sells, delivers, imports, or 15    purchases any assault weapon or .50 caliber rifle in 16    violation of Section 24-1.9. 17    (b) Sentence. A person convicted of a violation of 18subsection 24-1(a)(1) through (5), subsection 24-1(a)(10), 19subsection 24-1(a)(11), subsection 24-1(a)(13), or 24-1(a)(15) 20commits a Class A misdemeanor. A person convicted of a 21violation of subsection 24-1(a)(8) or 24-1(a)(9) commits a 22Class 4 felony; a person convicted of a violation of 23subsection 24-1(a)(6), 24-1(a)(7)(ii), 24-1(a)(7)(iii), or 2424-1(a)(16) commits a Class 3 felony. A person convicted of a 25violation of subsection 24-1(a)(7)(i) commits a Class 2 felony 26and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less   SB3683- 8 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1than 3 years and not more than 7 years, unless the weapon is 2possessed in the passenger compartment of a motor vehicle as 3defined in Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or on 4the person, while the weapon is loaded, in which case it shall 5be a Class X felony. A person convicted of a second or 6subsequent violation of subsection 24-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(8), 724-1(a)(9), 24-1(a)(10), or 24-1(a)(15) commits a Class 3 8felony. A person convicted of a violation of subsection 924-1(a)(2.5) or 24-1(a)(14) commits a Class 2 felony. The 10possession of each weapon or device in violation of this 11Section constitutes a single and separate violation.12    (c) Violations in specific places.13        (1) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(6) or 14    24-1(a)(7) in any school, regardless of the time of day or 15    the time of year, in residential property owned, operated 16    or managed by a public housing agency or leased by a public 17    housing agency as part of a scattered site or mixed-income 18    development, in a public park, in a courthouse, on the 19    real property comprising any school, regardless of the 20    time of day or the time of year, on residential property 21    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 22    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 23    site or mixed-income development, on the real property 24    comprising any public park, on the real property 25    comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance owned, leased 26    or contracted by a school to transport students to or from   SB3683- 9 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1    school or a school related activity, in any conveyance 2    owned, leased, or contracted by a public transportation 3    agency, or on any public way within 1,000 feet of the real 4    property comprising any school, public park, courthouse, 5    public transportation facility, or residential property 6    owned, operated, or managed by a public housing agency or 7    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 8    site or mixed-income development commits a Class 2 felony 9    and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 10    less than 3 years and not more than 7 years.11        (1.5) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(4), 12    24-1(a)(9), or 24-1(a)(10) in any school, regardless of 13    the time of day or the time of year, in residential 14    property owned, operated, or managed by a public housing 15    agency or leased by a public housing agency as part of a 16    scattered site or mixed-income development, in a public 17    park, in a courthouse, on the real property comprising any 18    school, regardless of the time of day or the time of year, 19    on residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 20    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 21    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 22    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 23    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 24    owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 25    students to or from school or a school related activity, 26    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public   SB3683- 10 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 2    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 3    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 4    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 5    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 6    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 7    commits a Class 3 felony.8        (2) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(1), 9    24-1(a)(2), or 24-1(a)(3) in any school, regardless of the 10    time of day or the time of year, in residential property 11    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 12    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 13    site or mixed-income development, in a public park, in a 14    courthouse, on the real property comprising any school, 15    regardless of the time of day or the time of year, on 16    residential property owned, operated or managed by a 17    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 18    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 19    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 20    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 21    owned, leased or contracted by a school to transport 22    students to or from school or a school related activity, 23    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 24    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 25    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 26    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or   SB3683- 11 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 2    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 3    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 4    commits a Class 4 felony. "Courthouse" means any building 5    that is used by the Circuit, Appellate, or Supreme Court 6    of this State for the conduct of official business.7        (3) Paragraphs (1), (1.5), and (2) of this subsection 8    (c) shall not apply to law enforcement officers, qualified 9    retired law enforcement officers, as defined in the 10    federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004 (18 11    U.S.C. 926B and 926C), as recognized under Illinois law, 12    or security officers of such school, college, or 13    university or to students carrying or possessing firearms 14    for use in training courses, parades, hunting, target 15    shooting on school ranges, or otherwise with the consent 16    of school authorities and which firearms are transported 17    unloaded enclosed in a suitable case, box, or 18    transportation package.19        (4) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "school" 20    means any public or private elementary or secondary 21    school, community college, college, or university.22        (5) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "public 23    transportation agency" means a public or private agency 24    that provides for the transportation or conveyance of 25    persons by means available to the general public, except 26    for transportation by automobiles not used for conveyance   SB3683- 12 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1    of the general public as passengers; and "public 2    transportation facility" means a terminal or other place 3    where one may obtain public transportation. 4    (d) The presence in an automobile other than a public 5omnibus of any weapon, instrument or substance referred to in 6subsection (a)(7) is prima facie evidence that it is in the 7possession of, and is being carried by, all persons occupying 8such automobile at the time such weapon, instrument or 9substance is found, except under the following circumstances: 10(i) if such weapon, instrument or instrumentality is found 11upon the person of one of the occupants therein; or (ii) if 12such weapon, instrument or substance is found in an automobile 13operated for hire by a duly licensed driver in the due, lawful 14and proper pursuit of his or her trade, then such presumption 15shall not apply to the driver.16    (e) Exemptions.17        (1) Crossbows, Common or Compound bows and Underwater 18    Spearguns are exempted from the definition of ballistic 19    knife as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 20    this Section.21        (2) The provision of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 22    of this Section prohibiting the sale, manufacture, 23    purchase, possession, or carrying of any knife, commonly 24    referred to as a switchblade knife, which has a blade that 25    opens automatically by hand pressure applied to a button, 26    spring or other device in the handle of the knife, does not   SB3683- 13 -LRB104 17931 RLC 31368 b1    apply to a person who possesses a currently valid Firearm 2    Owner's Identification Card previously issued in his or 3    her name by the Illinois State Police or to a person or an 4    entity engaged in the business of selling or manufacturing 5    switchblade knives. 6(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 7103-822, eff. 1-1-25.)